Nebraska, session 109, LB546.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB546 LB546
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 81-829.40, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-829.40 (1) The Governor shall be responsible for meeting the
dangers to the state and people presented by disasters, emergencies, and
civil defense emergencies, and in the event of disaster, emergency, or
civil defense emergency beyond local control, he or she may assume direct
operational control over all or any part of the emergency management
functions within this state. He or she shall have general direction and
control of emergency management and the Nebraska Emergency Management
Agency and shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the
Emergency Management Act.
(2) In order to effect the policy and purposes of the act, the
Governor may issue proclamations and make, amend, and rescind the
necessary orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the act.
(3) A state of emergency proclamation shall be issued by the
Governor if he or she finds that a disaster, emergency, or civil defense
emergency has occurred or that the occurrence or threat thereof is
imminent. All proclamations issued under this subsection shall indicate
the nature of the disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency, the
area or areas threatened, and the conditions which have brought about the
state of emergency. All proclamations shall be disseminated promptly by
means calculated to bring the contents to the attention of the general
public and shall be promptly filed with the Nebraska Emergency Management
Agency, the Secretary of State, and the clerks of the local governments
in the area to which it applies. The proclamation shall continue in
effect until the Governor finds that the threat or danger has passed or
the disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency has been dealt with
to the extent that those conditions no longer exist and terminates the
proclamation by letter of notice to such agency, the Secretary of State,
and the clerks of the local governments in the area to which it applies.
The Legislature by resolution may terminate a state of emergency
-2-

LB546 LB546
2025 2025
proclamation at any time, whereupon the Governor shall terminate the
proclamation by letter of notice to such agency, the Secretary of State,
and the clerks of the local governments in the area to which it applies.
(4) A state of emergency proclamation shall activate state, city,
village, county, and interjurisdictional emergency management
organizations and emergency operations plans applicable to the local
government or area in question and shall be the authority for the
deployment and use of any forces to which the plan or plans apply and for
use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, materials, and facilities
assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available pursuant to the
act or any other provision of law relating to disasters, emergencies, or
civil defense emergencies.
(5) During the continuance of any state of emergency, the Governor
shall be commander in chief of the organized and unorganized militia and
of all other forces available for emergency management duty. To the
greatest extent practicable, the Governor shall delegate or assign
command authority by prior arrangement embodied in appropriate
proclamations, orders, rules, and regulations, but nothing shall restrict
his or her authority to do so by orders issued at the time of the
disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency.
(6) In addition to any other powers conferred upon the Governor by
law, he or she may:
(a) Suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing the
procedures for conduct of state business or the orders, rules, or
regulations of any state agency if strict compliance with the provisions
of any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way prevent,
hinder, or delay necessary action in coping with the disaster, emergency,
or civil defense emergency;
(b) Utilize all available resources of the state government and of
each political subdivision of the state as are reasonably necessary to
cope with the disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency;
-3-

LB546 LB546
2025 2025
(c) Transfer the direction, personnel, or functions of state
departments and agencies or units thereof for the purpose of performing
or facilitating emergency management;
(d) Subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under
section 81-829.57, commandeer or utilize any private property if he or
she finds this necessary to cope with the disaster, emergency, or civil
defense emergency;
(e) Direct and compel the evacuation of all or part of the
population from any stricken or threatened area within the state if he or
she deems this action necessary for the preservation of life or other
emergency management;
(f) Prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in
connection with evacuation;
(g) Control ingress and egress to and from a disaster area, the
movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises in the
area;
(h) Suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of
alcoholic beverages, explosives, and combustibles; and
(i) Make provisions for the availability and use of temporary
emergency housing; and .
(j) Issue an emergency proclamation for multiple counties when
requested by any political subdivision of the state that supplies
electricity, natural gas, water, or sewer service. A political
subdivision that supplies electricity, natural gas, water, or sewer
service may request an emergency proclamation that covers one or more
counties for a disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency. Such
request may be made directly to the Governor without first requesting
such emergency proclamation from a county or any other governmental
entity.
(7) In the event of a civil defense emergency, the Governor shall
assume direct operational control over all or any part of the emergency
-4-

LB546 LB546
2025 2025
management functions within this state.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-829.40, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 3. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-5-